Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 116 Voter Registration
116.113.
Removal of voter’s name by state board upon notice of death, declaration of incompetency, conviction of felony, or out-of-state registration — Notice to county clerk.

Upon receipt of notification from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or other reliable sources of the death of a person, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except that no voter’s name may be removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary, general, or special election.

Upon receipt of notification from the circuit clerk that a person has been declared incompetent, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except that no voter’s name may be removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary, general, or special election.

Upon receipt of notification from the Administrative Office of the Courts that a person has been convicted of a felony offense, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except that no voter’s name may be removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary, general, or special election.

Upon receipt of notification from a local or state jurisdiction that a voter has registered to vote in the new local or state jurisdiction outside of the Commonwealth, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records that it maintains, except that no voter’s name may be removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any primary, regular election, or special election.

Following the purge of a name from the records of the State Board of Elections, the state board shall notify the clerk of the county in which the voter lived of the action; and the county clerk shall within ten (10) days update the county voter registration files to reflect the necessary change. If a protest is filed by the voter, the county board shall hear it at its next regular monthly meeting. If the county board decides in favor of the protesting voter, the voter’s registration record shall be restored, including his voting record. If the protest is filed while the registration books are closed and the county board decides in favor of the protesting voter, the county board shall issue the voter an “Authorization to Vote” for the upcoming election and the voter’s record shall be restored when the registration books open following the election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 99, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 63, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 116, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 197, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

116.115.
Purge of voter from county roster on notice from state board — Protest hearing. [Repealed.]

116.120.
Oath to be taken by election officers. [Repealed.]

116.124.
County clerk to make available to county board of elections data on deceased residents furnished by cabinet for human resources. [Repealed.]

116.125.
Purge on county board’s own knowledge — Procedure. [Repealed.]

116.127.
Purge in counties containing a city of the first class biennially — Procedure. [Repealed.]

116.130.
Absence of election officer — Selection of substitute. [Repealed.]

116.135.
Appeal from decision of county board.

Appeals from the decision of the county board of elections may be taken to the Circuit Court within ten (10) days following the final decision of the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 13.

116.140.
Pay of election officers. [Repealed.]

116.145.
Fee for registration.

The fee for registration of all voters shall be paid to the county clerk by the state in the amount of twenty-five cents ($0.25) for each person registered.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 14; 1976, ch. 247, § 11; 1978, ch. 202, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 185, § 5, effective July 13, 1984.

116.150.
Pay claim of election officer good for taxes. [Repealed.]

116.155.
Forms for registration — Information required.

All forms pertaining to registration shall be prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections. The registration form shall include the voter’s name; date of birth; membership in a political party, political organization, or political group as defined in KRS

118.015

, or independent status; Social Security number, if any; mailing and residence addresses, if different; and such other information as the State Board of Elections may deem necessary. No person shall be denied the right to register because of the failure to include his Social Security number. All forms which require a voter’s signature shall provide for verification by the signer thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 15; 1986, ch. 470, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 393, § 8, effective January 1, 1995; 2002, ch. 63, § 8, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). In Attorney General Opinion 94-42, it was concluded that 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 393, which amended this statute “will take effect on January 1, 1995, the date the National Voter Registration Act will take effect with respect to Kentucky.”

116.160.
Who to act when county sheriff is candidate or office is vacant. [Repealed.]

116.165.
Falsification of signature or verification.

Any person who falsely signs and verifies any form requiring verification shall be guilty of perjury and subject to the penalties therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 16.

116.170.
Duties and powers of persons acting in place of county sheriff. [Repealed.]

116.180.
Election precincts — Number of voters in — Procedure to require county judge to perform duties. [Repealed.]

116.190.
Alteration or division of precincts. [Repealed.]

116.192.
Precinct changes following redistricting of 1972. [Repealed.]

116.200.
Roster of voters eligible to vote in city and school board elections — Information to be provided to county clerk.

On or before January 1, 2011, each city clerk, except in consolidated local governments and urban-county governments, shall provide the clerk of the county or counties in which the city is located with a list of all properties within the city and a map of the city boundaries for the county clerk to maintain a roster of voters who are eligible to vote in city elections. A county clerk may accept the list of city properties in an electronic format and the city clerk may provide a copy of the city’s boundary map maintained by the Kentucky Commonwealth Office of Technology, Division of Geographic Information Systems; and

Documentation of any change to the boundaries of a city shall be reported to the county clerk in accordance with KRS

81A.475

.

On or before January 1, 2011, each school district board shall provide the clerk of the county in which the school district is located with maps and written descriptions of the boundaries of each school board district located in the county for the county clerk to maintain a roster of voters who are eligible to vote in school board elections.

Documentation of any change to a school district’s boundaries shall be reported to the county clerk within sixty (60) days of the change, or immediately if the change is within sixty (60) days of the August 1 deadline established in KRS 160.210(4)(d).

Each county clerk shall code all registered voters in that county in such a manner that precinct election officers may determine the voter’s eligibility to vote in city and school board elections prior to each primary and regular election for city officers in that county, each regular election for school board members in that county, and each special election in which a ballot question is presented to the residents of a city or a school board district.

Notwithstanding KRS

64.012

, the county clerk shall not charge a fee to a city or school district providing any information required by subsections (1)(a) and (2)(a) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county clerk from requesting additional information from the city, school district board, or any other reliable source to ascertain whether a registered voter resides within a city or a school district boundary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 394, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 69, § 13, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 78, § 8, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 41, § 3, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 81, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 41 and 81, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.